Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.450

Tourist promotion.

Any county in this state acting through its council or other legislative body shall have power to expend moneys and conduct promotion of resources and facilities in the county or general area by advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the purpose of attracting visitors and encouraging tourist expansion.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 61 s 1.]